Idaho, session 2025, H0262.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 36-408, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-408. COMMISSION'S AUTHORITY -- TAGS -- PERMITS -- NONRESIDENTS
LIMITED -- OUTFITTERS SET-ASIDE. (1) Tags and Permits -- Method of Use. The
commission is hereby authorized to prescribe the number and kind of wildlife
that may be taken under authority of the several types of tags and permits
provided for in this title and the manner in which said tags and permits shall
be used and validated. All Idaho wolf tags will be valid for hunting, trap-
ping, and snaring in any unit when seasons are open at the time of take. There
shall be no limit to the number of wolf tags that an individual can purchase.
All appropriate fish and game education requirements must be met.
(2) Limit -- Licenses, Tags or Permits -- Controlled Hunts. The commis-
sion is hereby authorized to establish a limit annually as to the number of
each kind and class of licenses, tags, or permits to be sold or issued and is
further authorized to limit the number or prohibit entirely the participa-
tion by nonresidents in controlled hunts.
(3) Outfitted Hunter Tags Set-Aside. When the commission establishes
a limit as to the number of nonresident deer tags and nonresident elk tags,
it shall set aside, when setting big game seasons, in a statewide pool, a
maximum of three thousand eight hundred seventy-five (3,875) nonresident
deer tags and three thousand two hundred (3,200) nonresident elk tags or
twenty-five percent (25%) of the nonresident deer tag and nonresident elk
tag total limit, whichever is greater. These tags may shall be allocated
to the licensed outfitted hunters in capped hunts, limited hunts, and con-
trolled hunts, and any future restricted hunts and set aside for outfitted
hunter use in general hunts.
(a) Such outfitted allocated set-aside tags shall be separate from the
tag numbers set for residents and nonresidents in each capped or con-
trolled hunt, limited, controlled, or future restricted hunts, unit, or
game management area. The set-aside tags shall be sold pursuant to com-
mission rule in accordance with the provisions of this section, only to
persons that have entered into a signed agreement for that year to uti-
lize the services of an outfitter licensed pursuant to chapter 21, title
36, Idaho Code.
(b) In order for a person to purchase any set-aside nonresident deer
tag or nonresident elk tag, that person's outfitter must submit an ap-
plication with the proper fees as required by the director. If any non-


resident deer tags or nonresident elk tags set aside for use in general
hunts pursuant to this subsection are unsold by July 15 of the year in
which they were set aside, they may be sold by the department to the gen-
eral public pursuant to commission rule. If any nonresident deer tags
or nonresident elk tags set aside as general capped allocated tags and
allocated pursuant to this subsection are unsold by July 31 of the year
in which they were set aside, they may be sold by the department to the
general public pursuant to commission rule.
(c) The commission may shall promulgate and implement all necessary
rules to implement, subject to legislative approval, in accordance with
the provisions of this subsection.
(4) Deer and Elk Tag Allocation. When setting big game seasons, if the
commission limits the number of deer or elk tags available for use in any game
management area, unit, or zone, the commission may shall allocate by rule,
where there are licensed outfitted operations, a number of deer and elk tags
from the outfitted hunter set-aside pool of tags as determined according to
the provisions of this section for use by hunters that have entered into a
signed agreement for that year to utilize the services of an outfitter li-
censed pursuant to chapter 21, title 36, Idaho Code.
(a) In addition to rules promulgated by the commission regarding al-
location, or pursuant to in accordance with this section, in capped,
limited, controlled, or any future restricted hunts the commission may
shall allocate the number of outfitted hunter elk and deer tags based on
the highest number within each of the last two (2) years of all elk or
deer tags using the services of an outfitter in each capped hunt. Any
additional tags above the original outfitted hunter tag quota may come
from the nonresident outfitted hunter set-aside pool or the nonresident
quota in the capped hunt, not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the non-
resident quota for each capped hunt. tags from the set-aside pool es-
tablished in subsection (3) of this section. The commission shall, ev-
ery two (2) years, recalculate all hunts using the historic use of the
highest tag use number from the previous two (2) years, subject to a max-
imum of fifty percent (50%) of the remaining nonresident tag limit. In
capped, controlled, and any future restricted hunts, when tag numbers
change for all users, they or when a new hunt is created, such changes
will apply proportionally to all user groups.
In controlled hunts, the commission may allocate the number of out-
fitted hunter elk or deer tags based on a number compiled from each out-
fitter's highest year within the last two (2) years of all elk or deer
tags using the services of an outfitter for each controlled hunt. Any
additional tags above the original outfitted hunter tag quota may come
from the nonresident outfitted hunter set-aside pool or the nonresident
quota in the controlled hunt, not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the
nonresident quota for each controlled hunt.
(b) Outfitted hunter tag use history will be provided through records
from the sale of outfitted hunter tags compiled by the Idaho department
of fish and game and verified use other than allocated tags recorded
with the department by December 20 by outfitters. The department shall
distribute the allocated outfitted tags through its point-of-sale ma-
chines.


(c) Beginning December 1, 2020, all outfitted deer and elk tag use shall
be verified in order to qualify for allocated outfitted hunter tag use
history. Verification consists of the purchase of allocated tags from
the Idaho department of fish and game or the use of an outfitter-pro-
vided agreement, including the tag number that is recorded with the de-
partment.
(d) All big game tags used in allocated outfitted hunts must be recorded
by outfitters with the department by December 20 each year. An admin-
istrative fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be assessed for each allo-
cated outfitted big game tag sold or exchanged at a point-of-sale ma-
chine. An administrative fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be as-
sessed for each big game tag submitted for verification as being outfit-
ted.
(e) The allocated tags shall be designated by the Idaho outfitters and
guides licensing board to those authorized outfitting operations li-
censed for elk and deer hunting for the use by the outfitted hunter, pur-
suant to section 36-2107(h), Idaho Code.
(f) Those tags not qualified for allocated tag use history include
emergency depredation, landowner appreciation program hunts, or meat
packing without an outfitted allocated deer or elk tag.
(g) The commission may shall promulgate and implement all necessary
rules to implement, subject to legislative approval, in compliance with
the provisions of this subsection.
(5) Special Game Tags. The commission is hereby authorized to issue two
(2) special bighorn sheep tags per year.
(a) Auction bighorn sheep tag. One (1) special bighorn sheep tag shall
be auctioned off by an incorporated nonprofit organization dedicated
to wildlife conservation selected by the commission. The tag shall be
issued by the department of fish and game to the highest eligible bid-
der. No more than five percent (5%) of all proceeds for the tag may be
retained by the organization. The tag to be issued pursuant to this
subsection shall be taken from the nonresident bighorn sheep tag quota.
The net proceeds shall be forwarded to the director for deposit in the
fish and game expendable trust account and shall be used for bighorn
sheep research and management purposes. Moneys raised pursuant to this
subsection may not be used to transplant additional bighorn sheep into
that portion of southwest Idaho south of the Snake river and west of U.S.
highway no. 93, nor for litigation or environmental impact statements
involving bighorn sheep. No transplants of bighorn sheep accomplished
with moneys raised pursuant to this subsection shall occur in any area
until hearings are conducted in the area. Provided however, that none
of the proceeds generated from the auction of bighorn sheep tags pur-
suant to this paragraph be used to purchase or acquire private property
or federally managed grazing permits, nor shall any proceeds generated
be used for matching funds for the purchase of private property or the
retirement or the acquisition of federally managed grazing permits.
(b) Lottery bighorn sheep tag. The commission is also authorized to is-
sue one (1) special bighorn sheep tag, which will be disposed of by lot-
tery. The lottery permit can be marketed by the department of fish and
game or a nonprofit organization dedicated to wildlife conservation se-


lected by the commission. The tag will be issued by the department of
fish and game to an eligible person drawn from the lottery provided in
this subsection. No more than twenty-five percent (25%) of gross rev-
enue can be retained for administrative costs by the organization. All
net proceeds for the tag disposed of by lottery pursuant to this sub-
section shall be remitted to the department and deposited in the fish
and game expendable trust account. Moneys in the account from the lot-
tery bighorn sheep tag shall be utilized by the department in solving
problems between bighorn sheep and domestic sheep, solving problems be-
tween wildlife and domestic animals or improving relationships between
sportsmen and private landowners.
(6) Issuance of Free Permit or Tag to Minor Children with Life-Threat-
ening Medical Conditions. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
commission may issue free big game permits or tags to minor children who have
life-threatening medical conditions that have been certified eligible by
a qualified organization. The commission may prescribe by rule the manner
and conditions of issuing and using the permits or tags authorized under this
subsection. For purposes of this subsection, a "qualified organization"
means a nonprofit organization that is qualified under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code and that affords opportunities and experiences to
minor children with life-threatening medical conditions.
(7) Issuance of Free Permit or Tag to Military Veterans with Disabil-
ities. The commission may prescribe by rule the manner and conditions of
using the permits or tags authorized under this subsection. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, the commission shall issue five (5) free big
game permits or tags to disabled military veterans whose disability has been
certified eligible by the Idaho division of veterans services. All veterans
applying must be sponsored by a "qualified organization," which for purposes
of this subsection means a governmental agency that assists veterans or a
nonprofit organization that is qualified under section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4)
or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code and that affords opportunities,
experiences and assistance to disabled veterans. The Idaho division of vet-
erans services shall screen all applicants to ensure only the most deserving
disabled veterans shall be issued these permits or tags. A list of screened
applicants shall be provided to the commission in priority order for is-
suance. The commission shall issue one (1) permit or tag each to the top two
(2) candidates for a sponsored hunt as designated by the Idaho division of
veterans services and the three (3) remaining permits or tags to candidates
sponsored by a qualified organization as described in this subsection.
(8) Special Wolf Tags. The commission is hereby authorized to issue up
to ten (10) special auction or lottery tags for hunting wolves. Special wolf
tags will be auctioned off or made available through lottery by incorporated
nonprofit organizations dedicated to wildlife conservation and selected by
the director. No more than five percent (5%) of all proceeds for each tag
may be retained by the nonprofit organization for administrative costs in-
volved. Each wolf tag shall be issued by the department of fish and game and
awarded to the highest eligible bidder or winner of a lottery. Each tag will
be good for the harvest of one (1) wolf pursuant to commission rule. The pro-
ceeds from each tag will be sent to the director to be placed in the depart-
ment general license fund.


(9) Special Big Game Auction Tags -- Governor's Wildlife Partnership
Tags. The commission is hereby authorized to issue special big game auc-
tion tags hereafter named and referred to as "Governor's wildlife partner-
ship tags" for hunting designated species on dates and in areas designated by
the commission. To enhance and sustain the value of Idaho's wildlife, up to
three (3) tags per species per year may be issued for deer, elk and pronghorn
antelope, one (1) tag per year may be issued for moose, and one (1) tag per
species per year may be issued for mountain goat and bighorn sheep. Each tag
will be signed by the governor of Idaho prior to auction to the public and be
available to either residents or nonresidents of Idaho. Governor's wildlife
partnership tags issued for deer, elk, pronghorn antelope and moose pursuant
to this subsection shall be taken from the nonresident controlled hunt pro-
grams for these species adopted by the fish and game commission. Governor's
wildlife partnership tags issued for mountain goat and bighorn sheep shall
be taken from the nonresident mountain goat and bighorn sheep quota. Gover-
nor's wildlife partnership tags shall be auctioned off by incorporated non-
profit organizations dedicated to wildlife conservation and selected by the
director. No more than five percent (5%) of all proceeds from each tag sale
may be retained by the nonprofit organization for administrative costs in-
volved, including in the event a tag is redonated and reauctioned. Each tag
shall be issued by the department of fish and game and awarded to the high-
est eligible bidder. Each tag shall be good for the harvest of one (1) big
game animal pursuant to commission rule consistent with the provisions of
this subsection. The proceeds from each tag shall be sent to the director to
be allocated up to thirty percent (30%) for sportsmen access programs, such
as access yes, and the balance for wildlife habitat projects, wildlife man-
agement projects to increase the quantity and quality of big game herds, and
other research and management activities approved by the commission. Pro-
vided however, that none of the proceeds generated from the auctions pur-
suant to the provisions of this subsection shall be used to purchase or ac-
quire private property or federally managed grazing permits, nor shall any
proceeds generated be used for matching funds for the purchase of private
property or the retirement or the acquisition of federally managed grazing
permits. Moneys raised pursuant to this subsection may not be used to trans-
plant additional bighorn sheep into that portion of southwest Idaho south of
the Snake river and west of U.S. highway no. 93, nor for litigation or envi-
ronmental impact statements involving bighorn sheep.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.